Washington statutes.
RCW 18.71.320

Physician health program—Procedures.

The entity shall develop procedures in consultation with the commission for:

(1) Periodic reporting of statistical information regarding physician health program participant activity;

(2) Periodic disclosure and joint review of such information as the commission may deem appropriate regarding reports received, contacts or investigations made, and the disposition of each report. However, the entity shall not disclose any personally identifiable information except as provided in subsections (3) and (4) of this section;

(3) Immediate reporting to the commission of the name and results of any contact or investigation regarding any suspected or verified impaired physician who is reasonably believed probably to constitute an imminent danger to himself or herself or to the public;

(4) Reporting to the commission, in a timely fashion, any suspected or verified impaired physician who fails to cooperate with the entity, fails to submit to evaluation or treatment, or whose impairment is not substantially alleviated through treatment, or who, in the opinion of the entity, is probably unable to practice medicine with reasonable skill and safety;

(5) Informing each participant of the physician health program of the program procedures, the responsibilities of program participants, and the possible consequences of noncompliance with the program.

[ 2022 c 43 s 7; 1998 c 132 s 5; 1994 sp.s. c 9 s 331; 1987 c 416 s 3. Formerly RCW 18.72.311.]

NOTES:

Finding—Intent—Severability—1998 c 132: See notes following RCW 18.71.0195.

Severability—Headings and captions not law—Effective date—1994 sp.s. c 9: See RCW 18.79.900 through 18.79.902.

Effective date—1987 c 416: See note following RCW 18.71.300.